Arkansas, session 2025, SB226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-708(b), concerning health and safety
in public schools and requirements for professional development in schools,
is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Every three (3) years as part of the requirements for
professional development, a person employed by a school district as an
athletics coach, licensed teacher coach, registered volunteer, or competitive
or noncompetitive spirit coach shall complete training on the events and
conditions identified in subsection (a) of this section.
(2) In addition to the training under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section, a person employed by a school district as an athletics coach,
licensed teacher coach, registered volunteer, or competitive or
noncompetitive spirit coach shall maintain a Basic Life Support certification
in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillation in
*JMB348*
02/13/2025 9:17:13 AM JMB348

SB226
accordance with best practices of the American Red Cross or the American
Heart Association, or both.
(3) The training under this section may include a component on
best practices for a coach to educate parents of students involved in
athletics on sports safety.































02/13/2025 9:17:13 AM JMB348